Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6248.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) As used in this act: (a) "Carbon dioxide substance" means a gaseous or liquid substance , consisting that consists primarily of carbon dioxide , that will be put in storage or that has been or will be used to produce hydrocarbons in a secondary or enhanced recovery operation. (b) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission. (c) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (2) A person exercising or claiming the right to carry or transport crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances, by or through pipe line or lines, for hire, compensation or otherwise, or exercising or claiming the right to engage in the business of piping, transporting, or storing crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances, or engaging in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in crude oil or petroleum or carbon dioxide substances within this state, does not have or possess the right to conduct or engage in the business or operations, in whole or in part, or have or possess the right to locate, maintain, or operate the necessary pipe lines, fixtures, and equipment belonging to, or used in connection with that business on, over, along, across, through, in, or under any present or future highway, or part thereof, or elsewhere, within this state, or have or possess the right of eminent domain, or any other right, concerning the business or operations, in whole or in part, except as authorized by and subject to this act. (3) Subsection (2) does not apply to a either of the following: (a) A right that exists on March 27, 1929 and is valid, vested, and incapable of revocation by any law of this state or of the United States. (b) The operation of a carbon sequestration well under part 651 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65101 to 324.65116. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6249 (request no. H03684'25). (b) House Bill No. 6247 (request no. H03686'25).